New York, session 2025-2026, A7880.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 16 of the correction law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. The reasonable expense of an independent autopsy requested by the 4 next of kin of an incarcerated individual whose death occurred in the 5 custody of the department shall, to the extent not otherwise reimbursed 6 by the state, be a state charge. Reimbursement of such expense shall be 7 made on vouchers submitted annually and certified by the chief fiscal 8 officer of the county or city as the case may be on the audit and 9 warrant of the comptroller. The next of kin of an incarcerated individ- 10 ual whose death occurred in the custody of the department may request 11 and shall be granted such independent autopsy after the receipt of a 12 death certificate pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10816-01-5